Maine, session 132, LD1089.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Income tax surcharge to fund education. An income tax surcharge is established
and administered as follows.
A. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, in addition to any other tax
imposed by this chapter, a surcharge at the rate of 4% is imposed on that portion of the
taxpayer's Maine taxable income in excess of $1,000,000.
B. All revenue collected under this subsection must be used to fund public
prekindergarten to grade 12 education.